Illinois, session 104th, HB1616.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Employee Blood and Organ Donation Leave Act 5is amended by changing Section 10 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 149/10)7    Sec. 10. Paid leave for blood donation; administration. 8    (a) On request, a participating employee subject to this 9Act may be entitled to leave with pay to donate blood or an 10organ.11    (b) A participating An employee may use up to one hour, or 12more if authorized by the employer or a collective bargaining 13agreement, to donate blood every 56 days in accordance with 14appropriate medical standards established by the American Red 15Cross, America's Blood Centers, the American Association of 16Blood Banks, or other nationally recognized standards.17    (b-5) A participating An employee or part-time employee of 18an employer may use up to 10 days of leave in any 12-month 19period to serve as an organ donor. For a part-time employee 20using leave under this subsection, the employer shall 21calculate the daily average pay the part-time employee 22received during his or her previous 2 months of employment and 23compensate the part-time employee in the amount of the daily   HB1616 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 09078 SPS 19134 b1average pay for the leave days used. 2    (c) A participating employee or part-time employee may use 3the leave authorized in subsection (b) or (b-5) of this 4Section only after obtaining approval from the employer.5    (d) The Department must adopt rules governing leave taken 6to donate blood or an organ, including rules that (i) 7establish conditions and procedures for requesting and 8approving leave and (ii) require medical documentation of the 9proposed blood or organ donation before leave is approved by 10the employer.11(Source: P.A. 103-450, eff. 1-1-24.)